Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.24.181

Regular filing period—Voids in candidacy.

(1) If a void in candidacy occurs following the regular filing period and deadline to withdraw, but prior to the day of the primary, filings for that office shall be reopened for a period of three normal business days, such three-day period to be fixed by the filing officer. The filing officer shall provide notice of the special filing period to newspapers, radio, and television in the county, and online. The candidate receiving a plurality of the votes cast for that office in the general election is deemed elected.

(2) This section does not apply to voids in candidacy in the office of precinct committee officer, which are filled by appointment pursuant to *RCW 29A.28.071.

[ 2011 c 349 s 11; 2006 c 344 s 8; 2004 c 271 s 166.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 29A.28.071 was recodified as RCW 29A.80.031 pursuant to 2013 c 11 s 93.

Effective date—2011 c 349 ss 10-12, 27, 28, and 30: See note following RCW 29A.24.171.

Effective date—2006 c 344 ss 1-16 and 18-40: See note following RCW 29A.04.311.